Utah statutes.
76-6-607.   Report of arrest to division.

Any arrest made for a violation of this part shall be reported by the appropriate jurisdiction to the Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division of the Department of Public Safety, established in Section 53-10-103, which shall keep a record of the arrest together with the disposition of the arrest for purposes of inquiry by any law enforcement agency.



Amended by Chapter 263, 1998 General Session

